ta_TA.aff
# An .aff file created for corpus based dictionary - By Ve. Elanjelian, Thamizha

SET UTF-8
TRY ்ுதமனகறடபரநலிஎாளஒவஇஙணேசவயேோஅூழொீஙஞஉஆஸஷஜஏஊஓஈஹௌஐஃஔ

REP 4
REP	ன்ர ன்ற
REP ன்ட ண்ட
REP ன்ட் ண்ட்
REP ன்டு ண்டு

FLAG num
SFX 1 Y 2
SFX 1     ம்     த்தை     ம்
SFX	1     0     யை     ை

SFX 2 Y 2
SFX 2     ம்     த்தில்     ம்
SFX 2     0     யில்     ை

SFX 3 Y 3
SFX 3     0     க்கு     ை
SFX 3     ம்     த்திற்கு     ம்
SFX 3     0     க்கு     ி
